District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

3-309

Manager; employment of additional personnel.

Repealed.

History

June 4, 1948, 62 Stat. 342, ch. 418, § 9
Aug. 19, 1964, 78 Stat. 494, Pub. L. 88-448, title IV, § 402(a)(27)
Aug. 23, 1994, D.C. Law 10-152, § 21(c), 41 DCR 4636
Mar. 23, 1995, D.C. Law 10-246, § 8(h)

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 2-309.
1973 Ed., § 2-1709.

Emergency Legislation

For temporary repeal of section, see § 8(h) of the Recreation Emergency Act of 1995 (D.C. Act 11-20, February 28, 1995, 42 DCR 1175).